Mississippi, session 2026, SB3253.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sum, or so much of it as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, to the Department of Education to defray costs associated with sensory supports, rooms or equipment, for students whose Individualized Education Program or 504 Plan identifies a need in order to ensure access to education, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027.................................. ............................................... $ 10,000,000.00. SECTION 2.  As a condition of receiving and expending the funds appropriated to the Department of Education under this act, the Department of Education shall promulgate and enforce reasonable rules and regulations to require public school districts to provide the accommodations described in Section 1 of this act using best practices to guide the design, supervision and evaluation of school facilities to meet individual student needs. SECTION 3.  The money appropriated by this act shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his or her warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.